Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.40.110

Employee checks, drafts, warrants—City may cash.

Any code city is hereby authorized, at its option and after the adoption of the appropriate ordinance, to accept in exchange for cash a payroll check, draft, or warrant; expense check, draft, or warrant; or personal check from a city employee in accordance with the following conditions:

(1) The check, warrant, or draft must be drawn to the order of cash or bearer and be immediately payable by a drawee financial institution;

(2) The person presenting the check, draft, or warrant to the city must produce identification as outlined by the city in the authorizing ordinance;

(3) The payroll check, draft, or warrant or expense check, draft, or warrant must have been issued by the city; and

(4) Personal checks cashed pursuant to this authorization cannot exceed two hundred dollars.

In the event that any personal check cashed for a city employee by the city under this section is dishonored by the drawee financial institution when presented for payment, the city is authorized, after notice to the drawer or endorser of the dishonor, to withhold from the drawer's or endorser's next payroll check, draft, or warrant the full amount of the dishonored check.

[ 1991 c 185 s 2.]